Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.060

Prelicensing training and continuing education requirements.

(1) The director shall adopt rules establishing prelicense training and testing requirements for bail bond agents, which shall include no less than four hours of classes. The director may establish, by rule, continuing education requirements for bail bond agents.

(2) The director or the director's designee, with the advice of law enforcement agencies and associations, the criminal justice training commission, prosecutors' associations, or such other entities as may be appropriate, shall consult with representatives of the bail bond industry and associations before adopting or amending the prelicensing training or continuing education requirements of this section.

(3) The director may appoint an advisory committee consisting of representatives from the bail bond industry and a consumer to assist in the development of rules to implement and administer this chapter.

[ 2008 c 105 s 2; 1993 c 260 s 7.]